Hawaii statutes.
§431N-6 Reporting, continued
funding. The department of health shall report to the legislature on or
about October 1, 1989, on the progress made in implementation of this chapter,
including:

(1) Establishment of an advisory committee to
review: the scope of the work to be done by a consultant, the input from the
committee and the community to the consultant, and the schedule of work of the
advisory committee;

(2) Final scope of work for the consultant, selection
of the consultant, and the consultant's workplan;

(3) Involvement of the departments of labor and
industrial relations, human services, and other departments needed to
successfully develop the program;

(4) Required data collection efforts to successfully
develop the program.

The department of health, in collaboration with
the health care contractors, shall submit reports to the legislature and the
governor no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each and every
legislative session regarding program activities and expenditures, needed
resources, participant demographics, evaluations, and such other information as
may be necessary to determine the usefulness of and continued need for the
state health insurance program.

The purchase of insurance shall not proceed
without the formal approval of the governor and a review by the legislature
during the 1990 regular session. Implementation is predicated upon the
successful completion of the consultant's reports and findings. The
legislature, by concurrent resolution, may opt to withhold funding appropriated
for implementation if not satisfied with the plan, provided that such a
concurrent resolution must be passed within thirty days after completion of the
implementation plan or March 1, 1990, whichever occurs last. [L 1989, c 378, pt
of §1; am L 1993, c 6, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next